Hawaii statutes.
§145-25 Enforcement; criminal penalties.
Violations of this part or any rule adopted pursuant thereto shall be criminal
offenses as follows:

(1) A violation in which the value of the
agricultural commodity exceeds $100 shall be a class C felony; and

(2) A violation in which the value of the
agricultural commodity is $100 or less shall be a misdemeanor. [L 1999, c 186,
pt of §2; am L 2003, c 20, §4; am L 2012, c 125, §4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next